Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6072.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17. (1) The board of hospital trustees shall have power to determine whether or not patients presented at said the public hospital for treatment are subjects for charity, and shall fix such the compensation for care of patients other than those unable to assist themselves, as the said board may deem considers proper, the receipts therefor to be paid to the treasurer of said the county and credited by him the treasurer to the hospital fund. (2) The power of a board of hospital trustees under this act is subject to the hospital financial assistance act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 95. (b) House Bill No. 6071.